Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 9.
PUBLIC PROPERTY,

PURCHASING
AND CONTRACTING

Chapter

101 Eminent Domain

102 Concessions on Public Property

103 Expenditure of Public Money and Public
Contracts

103B Employment of State Residents on Construction

Procurement Contracts

103D Hawaii Public Procurement Code

103F Purchases of Health and Human Services

104 Wages and Hours of Employees on Public Works

105 Government Motor Vehicles

106 Inventory, Accounting, and Disposal of
Government

Assets--Repealed

107 Public Improvements

107D State Facility Renovation Partnership Program

109 Stadiums and Recreational Facilities

110 State-Owned Cemeteries

111 Assistance to Displaced Persons

113 Land Acquisition Policies for Federally
Assisted Programs

115 Public Access to Coastal and Inland
Recreational Areas

CHAPTER
101

EMINENT
DOMAIN

Part I. Condemnation of Private Property

Section

101-1 Definitions

101-2 Taking private property for public use;
disposal

of excess property

101-3 Entry upon private property by agreement

101-3.5 Priority for lessees dislocated by
condemnation

proceedings

101-4 Right of eminent domain granted to public
utilities

and others

101-5 Fee simple or lesser estate may be
acquired

101-6 What property may be taken

101-7 Superior public use

101-8 Entering and surveying land

101-9 Actions; priority

101-10 Circuit courts have jurisdiction

101-11 Procedure as in civil actions

101-12 Evidence

101-13 Exercise of power by county

101-14 Plaintiff

101-15 Complaint; defendants

101-16 Complaint; additional contents; map

101-17 Different properties in one action

101-18 Joint or consolidated actions by
governmental agencies

101-19 Amendments of complaints, citations

101-20 Notice

101-21 Intervenors

101-22 Decision

101-23 Damages assessed, how

101-24 Assessed as of day of summons

101-25 Payment of judgment, penalties

101-26 Final order of condemnation

101-27 Defendant allowed damages upon abandonment
or

dismissal of proceedings

101-28 Possession pending action; immediate
occupation by

plaintiff

101-29 Possession pending action; alternative
procedure

101-30 Order of possession

101-31 Payment of estimated compensation; effect
thereof

101-32 Possession pending appeal

101-33 Allowance of interest, etc.

101-34 Issue as to use may be set for immediate
trial

101-35 Tax official as party; certificates, etc.

101-36 Certificate of deposit of moneys in court;
notice of

lien

101-37 Payment of taxes out of deposit

101-38 Further certificate of possession

101-39 Effect of abandonment of eminent domain
proceedings

Part II. Irrigation Corporations

101-41 Special power of eminent domain

101-42 Rights-of-way

101-43 Requirements prior to exercise of power

101-44 Right-of-way lapses when

Part III. Special Proceedings Relating to
Public

Property

101-51 Definitions

101-52 Proceedings authorized

101-53 Property already appropriated to a public
purpose

101-54 Part I provisions adopted; consolidation
of

proceedings

Part IV. Acquisition of Private Personal
Property

101-71 Taking private personal property for
public use

101-72 Negotiated purchase of private personal
property under

threat of condemnation

Rules of Court

Applicability of
Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP rule 81(b)(2).

Law Journals and Reviews

Dolan v. City of
Tigard: Individual Property Rights v. Land Management Systems. 17 UH L. Rev.
193.

Case Notes

Chapter did not
preempt ordinance relating to residential condominium leasehold conversion. 76
H. 46, 868 P.2d 1193.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next